Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB444.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 334A.020 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Assisting in the practice of speech pathology" means the provision of certain
specific components of a speech or language service program provided by a speech-
language pathology assistant under the supervision and direction of an appropriately
qualified supervisor;
(2) "Audiologist" means one who is licensed to practice audiology. An audiologist may
describe himself or herself to the public by any title or description of services
incorporating the words "audiologist," "audiology," "audiological," "hearing
center," "hearing clinic," "hearing clinician," "hearing therapist," "audiometry,"
"audiometrist," "audiometrics," "otometry," "otometrist," "aural rehabilitationist,"
or "hearing conservationist";
(3) "Board" means the Kentucky Board of Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology;
(4) "Continuing professional education" in speech-language pathology and audiology
consists of planned learning experiences beyond a basic educational program
leading to a degree. These experiences are designed to promote knowledge, skills,
and attitudes of speech-language pathology and audiology practitioners to enable
them to provide professional services in their areas of training that are based on
current research and best practices;
(5) "Interim license" means a license issued by the board pursuant to KRS 334A.035 to
a person for the purpose of completing the supervised postgraduate professional
experience required under that section prior to an application for licensure as a
speech-language pathologist or a speech-language pathology assistant;
(6) "Person" means any individual, organization, or corporate body, except that only
individuals can be licensed under this chapter;
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 1/20/2026 2:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 900
(7) "Practice of audiology":
(a) Means to:
1. Evaluate, diagnose, manage, and treat auditory or vestibular
conditions in the human ear;
2. Prescribe, order, sell, dispense, or fit hearing aids to an individual for
the correction or relief of a condition for which hearing aids are
worn;
3. Prescribe, order, sell, dispense, or externally fit a sound processor to
an osseo-integrated device for the correction or relief of a condition
for which osseo-integrated devices are worn; and
4. Prescribe, order, sell, dispense, or externally fit a sound processor to a
cochlear implant for the correction or relief of a condition for which
cochlear implants are worn;
(b) Includes:
1. Conducting health screenings;
2. Removing a foreign body from the external auditory canal that is not
impacted to the point it requires anesthesia;
3. Removing cerumen from the external auditory canal that is not
impacted to the point it requires anesthesia;
4. Ordering cultures and bloodwork testing as it relates to the auditory or
vestibular conditions of the human ear;
5. Ordering and performing in-office, non-radiographic scanning or
imaging of the external auditory canal;
6. Ordering radiographic imaging as it relates to the auditory or
vestibular conditions in the human ear; and
7. Employing, applying, administering, and prescribing topical otologic
pharmaceutical agents; and
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 1/20/2026 2:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 900
(c) Does not include:
1. Surgery that uses an instrument, including a laser, scalpel, needle,
cautery, cryoprobe, or suture, in which human tissue is cut, burned,
vaporized, removed, or otherwise permanently altered by mechanical
means, laser, ionizing radiation, ultrasound, or other means;
2. Osseo-integrated device surgery;
3. Cochlear implant surgery;
4. The preparation, operation, or performance of radiographic
imagery[the application of principles, methods, and procedures of
measurement, testing, appraisal, prediction, consultation, counseling,
and instruction related to hearing and disorders of hearing for the
purpose of modifying communicative disorders involving speech,
language, auditory behavior, or other aberrant behavior related to
hearing loss; planning, directing, conducting, or participating in
identification and hearing conservation programs; and habilitative and
rehabilitative programs, including hearing aid recommendations and
evaluation, prescribing, ordering the use of, selling and fitting hearing
instruments, including the selling and fitting of both prescription
hearing aids and over-the-counter hearing aids, auditory training, or
speech reading]; or
5. The independent diagnosis or treatment of suspected malignancies of
the ear, external canal, or skull base, which shall be referred to a
physician licensed under KRS Chapter 311;
(8) "Practice of speech pathology" means the application of principles, methods, and
procedures for the measurement, testing, audiometric screening, identification,
appraisal, determination of prognosis, evaluation, consultation, remediation,
counseling, instruction, and research related to the development and disorders of
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 1/20/2026 2:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 900
speech, voice, verbal and written language, cognition/communication, or oral and
pharyngeal sensorimotor competencies for the purpose of designing and
implementing programs for the amelioration of these disorders and conditions. Any
representation to the public by title or by description of services, methods, or
procedures for the evaluation, counseling, remediation, consultation, measurement,
testing, audiometric screening, identification, appraisal, instruction, and research of
persons diagnosed with conditions or disorders affecting speech, voice, verbal, and
written language, cognition/communication, or oral and pharyngeal sensorimotor
competencies shall be considered to be the practice of speech-language pathology;
(9) "Sound processor" means a nonsurgical, external unit that attaches to an
internal osseo-integrated device or cochlear implant;
(10) "Speech-language pathologist" means one who practices speech-language
pathology. A speech-language pathologist may describe himself or herself to the
public by any title or description of services incorporating the words "speech-
language pathologist," "speech-language pathology," "speech-language therapy,"
"speech-language correction," "speech-language correctionist," "speech-language
therapist," "speech clinic," "speech clinician," "speech pathologist," "language
pathologist," "language pathology," "language therapist," "logopedics,"
"logopedist," "communicology," "communicologist," "aphasiologist," "voice
therapy," "voice therapist," "voice pathology," "voice pathologist," "phoniatrist,"
"communication disorders," or "verbal therapist";
(11)[(10)] "Speech-language pathology assistant" means one who assists in the practice
of speech-language pathology only under the supervision and direction of an
appropriately qualified supervisor and only within the public school system in the
Commonwealth. Any speech-language pathology services provided without
appropriate supervision or outside the public school system shall be deemed to be
the unlicensed practice of speech-language pathology and shall subject the
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 1/20/2026 2:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 900
offending party to penalties established in KRS 334A.990;
(12)[(11)] "Supervisor" means a person who holds a Kentucky license as a speech-
language pathologist or who holds Education Professional Standards Board master's
level certification as a teacher of exceptional children in the areas of speech and
communication disorders as established by administrative regulation; and
(13)[(12)] "Temporary license" means a license that may be issued by the board
administrator pursuant to KRS 334A.181 to any applicant who has met all the
requirements for permanent licensure in accordance with that section.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 1/20/2026 2:59 PM Jacketed